Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.037

Baseball stadium construction agreement.

The public facilities district, the county, and the city with the largest population in the county shall enter into an agreement regarding the construction of a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. The agreement shall address, but not be limited to:

(1) Expedited permit processing for the design and construction of the project;

(2) Expedited environmental review processing;

(3) Expedited processing of requests for street, right-of-way, or easement vacations necessary for the construction of the project; and

(4) Other items deemed necessary for the design and construction of the project.

[ 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 308.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1995 3rd sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 82.14.0485.